New York, session 2025-2026, A4863.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 220.79 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 220.79 Criminal possession of fentanyl. 4 A person is guilty of criminal possession of fentanyl when such person 5 knowingly and unlawfully possesses, manufactures, distributes, or uses 6 fentanyl, or any fentanyl analogs, to enhance another illegal substance. 7 Criminal possession of fentanyl is a class E felony. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03085-01-5